Illinois, session 104th, HB5550.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 18-55, 18-56, 18-65, 18-70, 18-80, 18-85, and 18-90 6as follows: 7    (35 ILCS 200/18-55)8    Sec. 18-55. Short title and definitions. This Division 2 9may be cited as the Truth in Taxation Law. As used in this 10Division 2:11    (a) "Taxing district" has the meaning specified in Section 121-150 and includes home rule units, but from January 1, 2000 13through December 31, 2002 does not include taxing districts 14that have territory in Cook County.15    (b) "Aggregate levy" means the annual corporate levy of 16the taxing district and those special purpose levies which are 17made annually (other than debt service levies and levies made 18for the purpose of paying amounts due under public building 19commission leases).20    (c) "Special purpose levies" include, but are not limited 21to, levies made on an annual basis for contributions to 22pension plans, unemployment and worker's compensation, or 23self-insurance.  HB5550- 2 -LRB104 19230 HLH 32676 b1    (d) "Debt service" means levies made by any taxing 2district pursuant to home rule authority, statute, referendum, 3ordinance, resolution, indenture, agreement, or contract to 4retire the principal or pay interest on bonds, notes, 5debentures or other financial instruments which evidence 6indebtedness.7    (e) "Revenue neutral rate" means an aggregate tax rate for 8the taxing district for the current taxable year that, when 9extended against all of the taxable property in the district 10for the current tax year, would generate the same amount of 11property tax revenue as was levied by the taxing district in 12the previous tax year, using the current tax year's total 13assessed valuation of all property in the taxing district. 14(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99; 91-523, eff. 1-1-00.) 15    (35 ILCS 200/18-56)16    Sec. 18-56. Legislative purpose. The purpose of this Law 17is to require taxing districts to disclose by publication and 18to hold a public hearings hearing on their intention to adopt 19an aggregate levy that would cause to be extended against the 20taxable property in the district an aggregate tax rate that 21exceeds the revenue neutral rate. in amounts more than 105% of 22the amount of property taxes extended or estimated to be 23extended, including any amount abated by the taxing district 24prior to such extension, upon the final aggregate levy of the 25preceding year.  HB5550- 3 -LRB104 19230 HLH 32676 b1(Source: P.A. 88-660, eff. 9-16-94.) 2    (35 ILCS 200/18-65)3    Sec. 18-65. Restriction on extension. Until it has 4complied with the notice and hearing provisions of this 5Article, no taxing district shall levy an amount of ad valorem 6tax that would cause to be extended against the taxable 7property in the district an aggregate tax rate that exceeds 8the revenue neutral rate. which is more than 105% of the 9amount, exclusive of election costs, which has been extended 10or is estimated will be extended, plus any amount abated by the 11taxing district before extension, upon the final aggregate 12levy of the preceding year.13(Source: P.A. 86-957; 88-455.) 14    (35 ILCS 200/18-70)15    Sec. 18-70. Notice More than 5% increase; notice and 16hearing required. 17    (a) If the estimate of the corporate authority made as 18provided in Section 18-60 shows that the aggregate levy 19proposed by the district would cause to be extended against 20the taxable property in the district an aggregate tax rate 21that exceeds the revenue neutral rate is more than 105% of the 22amount extended or estimated to be extended, plus any amount 23abated by the corporate authority prior to extension, upon the 24final aggregate levy of the preceding year, exclusive of   HB5550- 4 -LRB104 19230 HLH 32676 b1election costs, the corporate authority shall give public 2notice of and hold a public hearing on its intent to adopt an 3aggregate levy would cause to be extended against the taxable 4property in the district an aggregate tax rate that exceeds 5the revenue neutral rate. in an amount which is more than 105% 6of the amount extended or estimated to be extended upon the 7final aggregate levy extensions, plus any amount abated, 8exclusive of election costs, for the preceding year. The 9hearing shall not coincide with the hearing on the proposed 10budget of the taxing district.11    (b) Beginning in levy year 2027, if a taxing district 12intends to extend a rate against the taxable property in the 13district that exceeds the revenue neutral rate, the governing 14body shall notify the county clerk of this intent. This 15notification must include the date, time, and location of the 16public hearing, as well as the proposed tax rate. After levy 17year 2027, the county clerk shall notify each taxpayer with 18property within the taxing subdivision by mail, directed to 19the taxpayer's last known address, if a taxing district 20proposes to exceed the revenue neutral rate. The notification 21shall be mailed at least 10 days prior to the public hearing. 22Alternatively, the county clerk may transmit the notice 23electronically, provided that both the taxpayer and the county 24clerk have given written consent to electronic communication 25and that the notice is sent at least 10 days before the public 26hearing. The county clerk is not required to send a notice to a   HB5550- 5 -LRB104 19230 HLH 32676 b1property owner of property that is exempt from ad valorem 2taxation. The county clerk shall compile the necessary 3information for all relevant taxing districts concerning the 4taxpayer's property into a single notice. This notice shall be 5formatted as prescribed by this Section. In no event shall 6this notice replace the notice required under Sec. 18-75. 7    (c) The notice shall be in the following form: 8    "Notice of Proposed Property Tax Increase for ... 9(commonly known name of taxing district). 10    This notice contains estimates of the tax on your property 11and proposed property tax increases. THE ACTUAL TAX ON YOUR 12PROPERTY MAY INCREASE OR DECREASE FROM THESE ESTIMATES. 13Governing bodies of taxing subdivisions must vote in order to 14exceed the Revenue Neutral Rate to increase the total property 15taxes collected. Governing bodies will vote at public hearings 16at the dates, times and locations listed. Taxpayers may attend 17and comment at the hearings. Property tax statements will be 18issued after rates are finalized and taxes are calculated. 19    Any person desiring to appear at the public hearing and 20present testimony to the taxing district may contact ... 21(name, title, address and telephone number of an appropriate 22official). 23    The total property taxes extended or abated for ... 24(preceding year) ... were ... (dollar amount). 25    The estimated total property taxes to be levied for ... 26(current year) ... are ... (dollar amount). This represents a   HB5550- 6 -LRB104 19230 HLH 32676 b1... (percentage increase or decrease) ... over the previous 2year. 3    The public hearing shall take place (Date, time, 4location).". 5(Source: P.A. 86-957; 88-455.) 6    (35 ILCS 200/18-80)7    Sec. 18-80. Time and form of notice. The notice shall 8appear not more than 14 days nor less than 7 days prior to the 9date of the public hearing. The notice shall be no less than 101/8 page in size, and the smallest type used shall be 12 point 11and shall be enclosed in a black border no less than 1/4 inch 12wide. The notice shall not be placed in that portion of the 13newspaper where legal notices and classified advertisements 14appear. The notice shall be published in substantially the 15following form:16    Notice of Proposed Property Tax Increase for ... (commonly 17known name of taxing district).18    I. A public hearing to approve a proposed property tax 19levy increase for ... (legal name of the taxing district)... 20for ... (year) ... will be held on ... (date) ... at ... (time) 21... at ... (location).22    Any person desiring to appear at the public hearing and 23present testimony to the taxing district may contact ... 24(name, title, address and telephone number of an appropriate 25official).  HB5550- 7 -LRB104 19230 HLH 32676 b1    II. The corporate and special purpose property taxes 2extended or abated for ... (preceding year) ... were ... 3(dollar amount of the final aggregate levy as extended, plus 4the amount abated by the taxing district prior to extension).5    The proposed corporate and special purpose property taxes 6to be levied for ... (current year) ... are ... (dollar amount 7of the proposed aggregate levy). This represents a ... 8(percentage) ... increase over the previous year.9    III. The property taxes extended for debt service and 10public building commission leases for ... (preceding year) ... 11were ... (dollar amount).12    The estimated property taxes to be levied for debt service 13and public building commission leases for ... (current year) 14... are ... (dollar amount). This represents a ... (percentage 15increase or decrease) ... over the previous year.16    IV. The total property taxes extended or abated for ... 17(preceding year) ... were ... (dollar amount).18    The estimated total property taxes to be levied for ... 19(current year) ... are ... (dollar amount). This represents a 20... (percentage increase or decrease) ... over the previous 21year.22    Any notice which includes any information not specified 23and required by this Article shall be an invalid notice.24    All hearings shall be open to the public. The corporate 25authority of the taxing district shall explain the reasons for 26the proposed increase and shall permit persons desiring to be   HB5550- 8 -LRB104 19230 HLH 32676 b1heard an opportunity to present testimony within reasonable 2time limits as it determines.3(Source: P.A. 92-382, eff. 8-16-01.) 4    (35 ILCS 200/18-85)5    Sec. 18-85. Notice if adopted levy exceeds proposed levy. 6If the final aggregate tax levy resolution or ordinance 7adopted would cause to be extended against the taxable 8property in the district an aggregate tax rate that exceeds 9the revenue neutral rate, is more than 105% of the amount, 10exclusive of election costs, which was extended or is 11estimated to be extended, plus any amount abated by the taxing 12district prior to extension, upon the final aggregate levy of 13the preceding year and is in excess of the amount of the 14proposed levy stated in the notice published under Section 1518-70, or is more than 105% of that amount and no notice was 16required under Section 18-70, the corporate authority shall 17give public notice of its action within 15 days of the adoption 18of the levy in the following form:19    Notice of Adopted Property Tax Increase for ... (commonly 20known name of taxing district).21    I. The corporate and special purpose property taxes 22extended or abated for ... (preceding year) ... were ... 23(dollar amount of the final aggregate levy as extended).24    The adopted corporate and special purpose property taxes 25to be levied for ... (current year) ... are ... (dollar amount   HB5550- 9 -LRB104 19230 HLH 32676 b1of the proposed aggregate levy). This represents a ... 2(percentage) ... increase over the previous year.3    II. The property taxes extended for debt service and 4public building commission leases for ... (preceding year) ... 5were ... (dollar amount).6    The estimated property taxes to be levied for debt service 7and public building commission leases for ... (current year) 8... are ... (dollar amount). This represents a ... (percentage 9increase or decrease) ... over the previous year.10    III. The total property taxes extended or abated for ... 11(preceding year) ... were ... (dollar amount).12    IV. The estimated total property taxes to be levied for 13... (current year) ... are ... (dollar amount). This 14represents a ... (percentage increase or decrease) ... over 15the previous year.16    A taxing district may, in its discretion and if 17applicable, include the following in the notice: 18    V. The taxing district has estimated its equalized 19assessed valuation to secure new growth revenue and must 20adhere to the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law (PTELL or 21"tax cap" law). PTELL limits the increase over the prior year 22in the property tax extension of this taxing district to the 23lesser of 5% or the percentage increase in the Consumer Price 24Index (CPI), which is (insert applicable CPI percentage 25increase). 26(Source: P.A. 96-504, eff. 8-14-09.)   HB5550- 10 -LRB104 19230 HLH 32676 b1    (35 ILCS 200/18-90)2    Sec. 18-90. Limitation on extension of county clerk. The 3tax levy resolution or ordinance approved in the manner 4provided for in this Article shall be filed with the county 5clerk in the manner and at the time otherwise provided by law. 6No amount more than the revenue neutral rate 105% of the 7amount, exclusive of election costs, which has been extended 8or is estimated to be extended, plus any amount abated by the 9taxing district prior to extension, upon the final aggregate 10levy of the preceding year shall be extended unless the tax 11levy ordinance or resolution is accompanied by a certification 12by the presiding officer of the corporate authority certifying 13compliance with or inapplicability of the provisions of 14Sections 18-60 through 18-85. An amount extended under Section 1518-107 in 1994 for a multi-township assessment district that 16did not file a certification of compliance with the Truth in 17Taxation Law may not exceed 105% of the amount, exclusive of 18election costs, that was extended in 1993, plus a proportional 19amount abated before extension, upon the levy or portion of a 20levy that is allocable to assessment purposes in each township 21that is a member of that multi-township assessment district.22(Source: P.A. 88-455; 88-660, eff. 9-16-94.)